Louisiana, session 2026, HB868.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:341(C), (D), and (G), 384(A) and (D), and 385(A)(1)(a) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 32:384(E)(3) and (F) and 385(A)(4) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§341. Brake equipment required
* * *
C. Every trailer or semi-trailer of semitrailer used in commerce or that was
originally manufactured with brakes and has a gross weight of 3,000 three thousand
pounds or more, when operated upon a highway of this state, shall be equipped with
brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold such vehicle and
so designed as to be applied shall be designed so that the brakes may be applied by
the driver of the towing motor vehicle from its cab, and said the brakes shall be so
designed and connected that in case of an accidental breakaway of the towed vehicle
the brakes shall be automatically applied. A semitrailer, pole trailer, full trailer, or
four-wheel pole trailer with gross weight of three thousand pounds or less shall not
be mandated to be equipped with braking systems, provided that the sum of the gross
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 868 ENROLLED
axle weight of the towed vehicle does not exceed forty percent of the sum of the
gross axle weight of the towing vehicle.
D. Every motor vehicle, trailer or semi-trailer semitrailer manufactured or
assembled after December 31, 1962, and thereafter sold in this state and operated
upon the highways of this state shall be equipped with brakes upon all wheels of
every such vehicle, if it was originally manufactured with brakes, except that no
motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or semi-trailer semitrailer of less than 1,500 three
thousand pounds gross weight, need be equipped with brakes.
* * *
G. All sport, boat, or any other nonagricultural trailers and semi-trailers of
less than 3000 pounds gross weight semitrailers not used in commerce between six
thousand and seven thousand pounds need not be equipped with brakes.
* * *
§384. Trailers and towed vehicles
A. The drawbar or connection between two vehicles or implements of
husbandry, when one is towing the other, shall be of sufficient strength to pull all
weight towed thereby and shall not exceed fifteen feet from one vehicle to the other,
except that the drawbar or connection may exceed fifteen feet between any two
vehicles transporting poles, pipes, machinery, or other objects of a structural nature
which cannot be readily dismembered. The drawbar or connection shall be securely
affixed in strict compliance with the manufacturer's specifications. This includes the
installation of all required pins, clips, or locking mechanisms, thereby ensuring the
prevention of any unintentional uncoupling while in operation.
* * *
D. Every trailer and semitrailer originally manufactured with safety chains
or other safety devices with a loaded gross weight capacity of up to six thousand
pounds shall be equipped with safety chains or other safety device devices approved
in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. The safety chains or other approved
safety device devices shall be securely attached to the towing vehicle when the trailer
or semitrailer is in motion and shall be of sufficient strength to hold the trailer behind
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 868 ENROLLED
the towing vehicle in case the connection between the two vehicles detaches. The
provisions contained in this Section shall not apply to fifth-wheel devices mounted
on truck tractors or comparable towing vehicles, including convertor dollies, that
interface and connect with the upper coupler assembly of a semitrailer.
E.
* * *
(3) Safety chains and other safety devices mandated by Subsection D of this
Section shall conform to manufacturer specifications or applicable federal motor
vehicle safety standards. These devices shall be deemed sufficient to ensure the
secure connection between the towing vehicle and the trailer or semitrailer in the
event of a failure of the primary coupling device.
F. The provisions contained in Subsections D and E of this Section,
regarding safety chains or approved safety devices, shall not apply to any trailer,
semitrailer, or vehicle while being operated exclusively on private property, or solely
for the crossing of a public roadway by a trailer, semitrailer, or implement of
husbandry between contiguous parcels of land owned or leased by the same person.
§385. Farm vehicles and equipment; exemptions
A.(1)(a) Farm and agricultural vehicles and equipment, except draglines and
bulldozers, being operated or transported for bona fide agricultural purposes or the
transportation of farm vehicles and equipment to be used for normal farm purposes
by persons transporting such farm equipment or machinery, for distances not to
exceed fifty miles from the point of origin, and fertilizer tending units shall be
exempt from the requirements of R.S. 32:380 through 382 and, additionally, farm
equipment shall be exempt from the requirements of R.S. 32:384 R.S. 32:384(B),
(C), and (E)(1) and (2).
* * *
(4) Trailers, semitrailers, and any implements of husbandry used in
connection with farm and agricultural vehicles and equipment shall comply with the
towing safety requirements of R.S. 32:384(A), (D), and (E)(3). The drawbar or other
primary connection between a towing vehicle and a trailer or semitrailer shall be
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 868 ENROLLED
securely affixed in accordance with the manufacturer's specifications, including the
installation of all required pins, clips, or locking mechanisms, to prevent
unintentional uncoupling while in operation.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.